Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 13.
PLANNING AND

ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

Chapter

201 Department of Business, Economic
Development, and

Tourism

201B Hawaii Tourism Authority

201C Financial Services Assistance Program

201D Business Action Center--Repealed

201E Housing Finance and Development
Corporation--Repealed

201F Rental Housing Trust Fund--Repealed

201G Housing and Community Development
Corporation

of Hawaii--Repealed

201H Hawaii Housing Finance and Development Corporation

201M Small Business Regulatory Flexibility Act

201N Renewable Energy Facility Siting Process--Repealed

202 Hawaii Workforce Development Council

203 Tourism Development--Repealed

204 State Fairs--Repealed

205 Land Use Commission

205A Coastal Zone Management

206 Oahu Land Development

206E Hawaii Community Development Authority

206G Kalaeloa Community Development
District--Repealed

206J Aloha Tower Development Corporation

206M High Technology Development Corporation

206P Hawaii Telecommunications and Information
Industries

Act--Repealed

206X Convention Center Authority--Repealed

207 Mortgage Loans

208 Economic Redevelopment Program for Depressed

Areas--Repealed

209 Disaster Relief and Rehabilitation

209E State Enterprise Zones

210 Capital Loan Program

210D Community-Based Development

211 Guarantee of Commercial Loans--Repealed

211D Capital Access Program

211E Hawaii Innovation Development Program

211F Hawaii Strategic Development Corporation

211G State Private Investment Fund--Repealed

212 Foreign-Trade Zones

213 Research and Development Industry Promotion
Program

213E Employee Ownership and Participation
Programs--Repealed

214 Grants-in-Aid for County Capital Improvement
Projects

218 Marine Affairs Coordinator--Repealed

219 Aquaculture Loan Program

220 Aquaculture Farms

221 Commission on the Year 2000--Repealed

222 Hawaii Research Center for Futures Study--Repealed

223 Quality Growth Policy

224 State Population and Planning--Repealed

225 Policy Planning--Repealed

225M State Planning

225P Climate Adaptation

226 Hawaii State Planning Act

227 Natural Energy Laboratory of
Hawaii--Repealed

227D Natural Energy Laboratory of Hawaii
Authority

228 Ocean Resources Management--Repealed

229 Sister-State and Province Relationships

CHAPTER
201

DEPARTMENT
OF BUSINESS, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT,

AND
TOURISM

Part I. Research and Economic Development

Section

201-1 Definitions

201-2 General objective, functions, and duties
of department

201-2.5 Fees for services rendered and products
provided

201-3 Specific research and promotional
functions of the

department

201-4 Contracts

201-5 Promotion director and employees

201-6 Interested members or employees

201-7 Advisory committees

201-8 Recommendations to agencies

201-8.5 Night sky protection strategy

201-9 Cooperation with other agencies;
acceptance and

spending of grants; dissemination of
findings

201-10 Reports

201-11 Expenditures

201-12 State program for energy planning and
conservation

201-12.5 Renewable energy facilitator;
establishment; duties

201-12.8 Energy security special fund; uses

201-13 Powers and duties of the department of
business,

economic development, and tourism in
marine affairs

201-13.5, 13.6 Repealed

201-13.7 Federal funds

201-13.8 Data or information collection

201-13.9 Medical marijuana; economic and other
data; collection

201-14 Consolidated film permit processing

201-15 Repealed

201-16 Annual report; workforce development

201-17 Office of international affairs;
established

201-18 Brownfields cleanup revolving loan fund

201-19 Research and statistics for growth
industries

201-20 Building energy efficiency revolving loan fund

Part II. Planning

201-21 to 31 Repealed

Part III. Planning Information

201-43.5 to 45 Repealed

Part IV. Facilitation of Permit Processing

201-61 Definitions

201-62 Facilitated application process

201-62.5 Repealed

201-63 Information services

201-64 Streamlining activities

201-65 Reporting

Part V. Office of Aerospace Development

A. General Provisions

201-71 Definitions

201-72 Office of aerospace development;
establishment

201-72.5 Aerospace advisory committee

201-72.6 Hawaii unmanned aerial systems test site
advisory

board; established

201-72.7 Hawaii unmanned aerial systems test site
chief

operating officer

201-73 Powers and duties of director

201-74 Repealed

201-75 Space vehicles; prohibitions

B. Pacific International Space Center for

Exploration Systems

201-76 Pacific international space center for
exploration

systems

201-77 Pacific international space center for
exploration

systems; board of directors;
establishment; duties

201-78 General powers

201-79 Powers and duties of the Pacific
international space

center for exploration systems executive
director

201-80 Pacific international space center for
exploration

systems; reporting requirement

201-80.2 Pacific international space center for
exploration

systems special fund

Part VI. Out-of-State Offices

201-81 Establishment of out-of-state offices;
purposes

201-82 Powers of the department

201-83 Rules

201-84 Annual report

201-85 Exemptions

Part VII. Tourism--Repealed

201-91 to 99 Repealed

Part VIII. Recycling

201-101 Development of markets for recycled
materials

201-101.5 Definitions

201-102 Advisory committees

201-103 Studies

201-104 Report

201-105 Legislation and rules

201-106 Repealed

Part IX. Hawaii Television and Film Development

201-111 Definitions

201-112 Hawaii television and film development
board

201-113 Hawaii television and film development
special fund

201-114 Inspection of premises and records

Note

Alternative energy
research and development pilot program (ceases to exist June 30, 2017);
revolving fund (abolished June 30, 2017). L 2015, c 159.

Chapter heading
amended by L 1987, c 336, §7; L 1990, c 293, §8.

Greenhouse gas
emissions reduction task force (report to 2010 legislature and every five years
thereafter). L 2007, c 234, §§1 to 7; L 2008, c 235.

Leasing of Hawaii
film studio and continuity of film industry branch. L 1997, c 127, §§5, 6.

Reclassification of
various housing loan special funds. L 2015, c 237, part V.

State goal for affordable
rental housing units; special action team (terminated December 31, 2019);
annual reports to 2017-2019 legislature. L 2016, c 127.

Study on feasibility
of a reentry academy for training and entrepreneurial resources (RAFTER) for
prison inmates; report to 2017 legislature. L 2016, c 227, §§3 to 5.

Venture accelerator
funding program; reports to legislature. L 2012, c 170.

Cross References

Energy emergency
preparedness, see §§125C-31, 32.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next